Alabama, session 2026rs, HB515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 15-16-61 and 15-16-71, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§15-16-61
The following definitions shall apply to this
articleFor the purposes of this article, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) COURT. The court whichthat committed the defendant
pursuant to Section 15-16-43.
(2) DEFENDANT. A defendant in a criminal case who has
been found not guilty by reason of insanity, or not guilty by
reason of mental disease or defect, or is determined by the
court to be incompetent to proceed to trial or not restorable
to competency within a reasonable time, and has been committed
to the custody of the Alabama State Department of Mental
Health and Mental Retardation or another facility as provided
by Section 15-16-43.
(3) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Mental Health
and Mental Retardation.
(4) DISTRICT ATTORNEY. The district attorney for the
judicial circuit of the court whichthat committed the
Page 2

judicial circuit of the court whichthat committed the
HB515 INTRODUCED
defendant pursuant to Section 15-16-43.
(5) REGIONAL OR COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH FACILITY. Any
mental health facility providing mental health services
pursuant to Sections 22-51-1 through 22-51-14."
"§15-16-71
(a) If at any time after a defendant has been
conditionally released, it appears that removal of some of the
conditions or release of the defendant without conditions will
not cause the defendant to pose a real and present threat of
substantial harm to himself, herself, or to others by being at
large, the court, after a hearing, shall remove the
unnecessary conditions, or it shall order the defendant
released unconditionally and terminate its jurisdiction over
the case, as the case may be. All such hearings shall be
preceded by notice to the department and to the parties
required to be notified in Section 15-16-63.
(b) The department, or its designated provider, shall
not provide custody, care, and treatment for a period of time
exceeding the maximum sentence the defendant could receive if
convicted of the crime with which he or she is charged, or no
longer than 20 years, whichever is less, notwithstanding Rule
11 and Rule 25 of the Alabama Rules of Criminal Procedure,
except for a defendant who:
(1) Is charged with capital murder; or
(2) Otherwise continues to meet civil inpatient
commitment criteria.
(c) The court shall consider the guidelines in this
section when the circuit judge issues his or her initial order
Page 3

section when the circuit judge issues his or her initial order
HB515 INTRODUCED
of commitment to the department."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4